Maryland, session 2025, SB0853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0853*

SENATE BILL 853
(b) (1) (i) Unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, a person may not begin construction in
the State of:
1. a generating station; or
2. a qualified generator lead line.
(H) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY NOT AUTHORIZE, AND A PERSON MAY NOT UNDERTAKE, THE
CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE THAT DOES NOT UTILIZE AN
EXISTING TRANSMISSION LINE RIGHT–OF–WAY UNLESS THE APPLICANT
ADEQUATELY DEMONSTRATES TO THE COMMISSION THAT EXISTING TRANSMISSION
LINE RIGHTS–OF–WAY ARE NOT SUFFICIENT FOR THE PROPOSED OVERHEAD
TRANSMISSION LINE.
(2) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT AN EXISTING
TRANSMISSION LINE RIGHT–OF–WAY IS NOT SUFFICIENT FOR A PROPOSED
OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE, THE COMMISSION MAY AUTHORIZE
CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE WITHIN 0.25 MILES OF
AN EXISTING OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE.
[(h)] (I) (1) A county or municipal corporation has the authority to approve
or deny any local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity
issued under this section.
(2) A county or municipal corporation shall approve or deny any local
permits required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this
section:
(i) within a reasonable time; and
(ii) to the extent local laws are not preempted by State law, in
accordance with local laws.
(3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section on receipt of any of the following approvals for any aspect of a generating
station, an overhead transmission line, or a qualified lead line proposed to be constructed
under the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.

SENATE BILL 853 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.